Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-4,114.02
Inmate; disciplinary measures; confirmation testing; costs.

(1) Before disciplinary measures are taken against an inmate for drug or alcohol violations, an inmate may request and the department shall provide independent confirmation testing of positive results of:

(a) Urinalysis testing; or

(b) Any screening test, field test, presumptive test, or spot test of an item suspected of being or containing a contraband drug.

(2) If the confirmation test remains positive, the inmate shall be required to pay the cost of the confirmation test.

Laws 1999, LB 865, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB519, § 1.